Idaho, session 2026, H0848.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Legislative Branch the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. LEGISLATIVE SERVICES OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,892,000 $1,051,600 $8,943,600
TechnologyInfrastructureStabilization
Fund 127,300 15,000 142,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 117,800 94,000 211,800
LegislativeCapitolFacilities
Fund 440,000 440,000
Professional Services
Fund 2,109,200 152,500 2,261,700
TOTAL $10,246,300 $1,753,100 $11,999,400
II. OFFICE OF PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,048,900 $40,800 $1,089,700
GRAND TOTAL $11,295,200 $1,793,900 $13,089,100


SECTION 2. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMI-
TATIONS. The Legislative Services Office and Office of Performance Evalua-
tions are hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511 (1), (2),
and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between expense classes
and between programs, for all moneys appropriated to them for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be
transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOV-
ERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Technology Pro-
gram any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropri-
ated to the Legislative Technology Program from the ARPA State Fiscal Recov-
ery Fund for fiscal year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.